Colorado, session 2026A, SB150.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Modernizing the Regional Transportation District Act".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-102, add (3) and
(4) as follows:
32-9-102. Legislative declaration.
(3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) SENATE BILL 25-161, ENACTED IN 2025, DIRECTED THE REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT TO MAXIMIZE RIDERSHIP LEVELS ACROSS THE
REGION AND CREATED A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE. THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE WAS
CREATED TO EVALUATE AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS RELATED TO
GOVERNANCE, WORKFORCE RETENTION, AND PARATRANSIT SERVICES.
(b) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE WAS COMPOSED OF A DIVERSE
SET OF APPOINTMENTS REPRESENTING KEY CONSTITUENCIES OF THE
DISTRICT, INCLUDING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, DISTRICT BOARD MEMBERS,
TRANSIT RIDERS WITH DISABILITIES, TRANSPORTATION EQUITY ADVOCATES,
ENVIRONMENTAL ADVOCATES, FINANCIAL EXPERTS, AND MORE;
(c) TO CARRY OUT ITS STATUTORY RESPONSIBILITIES, THE
ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE IMPLEMENTED A ROBUST PROCESS GUIDED BY
A NEUTRAL FACILITATOR, WHICH GENERATED THIRTY-ONE
RECOMMENDATIONS SUPPORTED BY A MAJORITY OF THE COMMITTEE;
(d) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE IDENTIFIED SEVERAL
SYSTEMIC CHALLENGES FACING THE DISTRICT, INCLUDING LOW AND
STAGNATING RIDERSHIP, MOUNTING BUDGET CHALLENGES, A LOSS OF PUBLIC
TRUST AND CONFIDENCE, AND A LACK OF A COORDINATED, STRATEGIC
VISION;
(e) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE IDENTIFIED SEVERAL
GOVERNANCE-RELATED CHALLENGES FACING THE DISTRICT, INCLUDING THE
LARGE SIZE OF THE BOARD;
(f) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE FOUND THAT THE SIZE OF THE
BOARD POSED CHALLENGES TO BRIEFING MEMBERS, DEVELOPMENT OF
PRODUCTIVE WORKING RELATIONSHIPS AMONG MEMBERS, REACHING
COMMON UNDERSTANDINGS, AND NAVIGATING DIFFICULT DECISIONS. THOSE
FINDINGS ECHO THE 2021 RTD GOVERNANCE EVALUATION FINAL REPORT,
WHICH STATED: "BEST PRACTICE SHOWS THAT AS GOVERNING BOARDS GROW
IN SIZE, THE EFFICACY OF THEIR WORK DECREASES."
(g) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE ALSO IDENTIFIED THE LACK
OF COMPETITION FOR ELECTED SEATS AND THE LACK OF EXPERTISE ON THE
BOARD AS GOVERNANCE-RELATED CHALLENGES FACING THE DISTRICT.
ACCORDING TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE, OUT OF ONE HUNDRED
SEVENTY-TWO DISTRICT ELECTORAL CONTESTS OCCURRING SINCE 1980,
FORTY PERCENT WERE UNCONTESTED. THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE
IDENTIFIED A NEED FOR KEY AREAS OF BOARD EXPERTISE TO ENSURE THE
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-150

BOARD COULD PROVIDE THE NECESSARY POLICY LEADERSHIP AND FISCAL
OVERSIGHT TO GUIDE THE DISTRICT THROUGH ITS CHALLENGES.
(h) WHILE THE DISTRICT HAS SERVED THE REGION FOR DECADES
UNDER ITS CURRENT GOVERNANCE MODEL, THE ACCOUNTABILITY
COMMITTEE DETERMINED THAT THE STRUCTURES, PRACTICES, AND
EXPECTATIONS THAT MAY HAVE BEEN ADEQUATE IN THE PAST ARE NO
LONGER SUFFICIENT TO MEET THE SCALE, COMPLEXITY, AND URGENCY OF
THE DISTRICT'S CURRENT AND FUTURE CHALLENGES;
(i) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE CONCLUDED THAT THE
CURRENT GOVERNANCE STRUCTURE DOES NOT ADEQUATELY PROVIDE THE
LEVEL OF EXPERTISE, ACCOUNTABILITY, AND STRATEGIC LEADERSHIP
REQUIRED TO SUPPORT THE DISTRICT'S SCALE, FISCAL COMPLEXITY, AND
REGIONAL IMPORTANCE, AND THAT THERE IS AN URGENT NEED FOR REFORM;
AND
(j) THE ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE FURTHER CONCLUDED THAT
THE DISTRICT IS AT A CRITICAL CROSSROADS, THE DISTRICT'S CURRENT
GOVERNANCE STRUCTURE DOES NOT WORK IN THE PRESENT AND WILL NOT
WORK IN THE FUTURE, AND SIGNIFICANT CHANGE IS NEEDED IN THE FORM OF
A DIFFERENT DISTRICT GOVERNANCE STRUCTURE.
(4) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT
THIS SENATE BILL 26-150, ENACTED IN 2026, ADVANCES IMPLEMENTATION
OF THE REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE
RECOMMENDATIONS THAT ARE RELEVANT TO THE REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT STATUTES, WHILE SOME RECOMMENDATIONS
WERE MADE DIRECTLY TO THE DISTRICT OR OTHER KEY STAKEHOLDERS. THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY EXPECTS THE DISTRICT TO EXECUTE AND REPORT ON
THE STATUS OF ALL RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE 2025-2026
ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THOSE
RECOMMENDATIONS ARE IMPLEMENTED IN THIS SENATE BILL 26-150,
ENACTED IN 2026.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-103, add (9.5) as
follows:
32-9-103. Definitions.
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-150

As used in this article 9, unless the context otherwise requires:
(9.5) "PARATRANSIT" OR "PARATRANSIT SERVICE" MEANS
COMPLEMENTARY PARALLEL TRANSIT SERVICE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES WHO ARE UNABLE TO UTILIZE REGULAR OR FIXED-ROUTE
TRANSIT SERVICE FOR SOME OR ALL OF THEIR TRANSIT NEEDS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-165, add (2.5),
(3)(c), (3)(d), and (3)(e) as follows:
32-9-165. Planning - ten-year plan - comprehensive operational
analysis - accessible transportation service plan - reporting - funding
study - transit-oriented community infrastructure - budget
transparency and oversight.
(2.5) Paratransit service study and accessible transportation
service plan.
(a) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE DISTRICT SHALL
CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT THIRD-PARTY ENTITY TO CONDUCT A
COMPREHENSIVE PARATRANSIT SERVICE STUDY. THE STUDY MUST BE
COMPLETED BY JUNE 30, 2027. THE DISTRICT SHALL REQUIRE THAT THE
INDEPENDENT THIRD-PARTY ENTITY PROVIDE QUARTERLY UPDATES ON THE
PROGRESS OF THE STUDY TO THE BOARD. THE STUDY MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A NEEDS ASSESSMENT OF THE POPULATION, NEEDS, AND SERVICE
GAPS FOR RIDERS IN THE DISTRICT WITH DISABILITIES THAT INCLUDES AN
ANALYSIS OF RIDER-LEVEL AND TRIP-LEVEL DATA, INCLUDING THE
DISTRIBUTION OF TRIP FREQUENCY, IDENTIFICATION OF HIGH-UTILIZATION
RIDERS, CHANGES IN RIDERSHIP PATTERNS FOLLOWING THE JANUARY 1,
2026, FARE AND SUBSIDY CHANGES, IMPACTS OF THOSE CHANGES ON
FREQUENT AND HIGH-NEED RIDERS, AND REDUCTION OF ACCESS TO SERVICE
DUE TO LOSS OF SERVICE OR ECONOMIC HARDSHIP FROM FARE CHANGES;
(II) A COST-BENEFIT ASSESSMENT WITH LONG-TERM PROJECTIONS
BETWEEN COST REDUCTIONS AND SERVICE AVAILABILITY OR ACCESS OF
PARATRANSIT SERVICE DELIVERY MODELS FOR ACCESS-A-RIDE AND
ACCESS-ON-DEMAND, INCLUDING INTEGRATED, HYBRID, STAND-ALONE, AND
ALTERNATIVE SERVICE SCENARIOS, AND INCLUDING ANALYSIS OF CHANGES
TO FARE LEVELS, SUBSIDIES, AND SERVICE LIMITS, WHICH ASSESSMENT MUST
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-150

INCLUDE PEER AGENCY COMPARISONS AND USE STANDARDIZED COST
DEFINITIONS AND METHODOLOGY, ANALYSIS OF COST PER TRIP AND PER
RIDER, AND IDENTIFICATION OF KEY COST DRIVERS, SUCH AS DISTINCTIONS
BETWEEN FIXED AND VARIABLE COSTS;
(III) A DEFINITION OF MEASURABLE PERFORMANCE METRICS RELATED
TO ACCESS, RELIABILITY, EQUITY, AND COST-EFFECTIVENESS;
(IV) AN ASSESSMENT OF OPPORTUNITIES TO COLLABORATE WITH
LOCAL AND REGIONAL PARTNERS TO ADDRESS SERVICE GAPS;
(V) ENGAGEMENT WITH PARATRANSIT USERS, RIDERS WITH
DISABILITIES, SERVICE PROVIDERS, AND OTHER KEY STAKEHOLDERS AND
DOCUMENTATION OF HOW STAKEHOLDER INPUT INFORMED FINDINGS;
(VI) AN ASSESSMENT OF SYSTEM PERFORMANCE, INCLUDING
RELIABILITY METRICS, TRIP DENIALS, WAIT TIMES, ON-TIME PERFORMANCE,
AND RIDER EXPERIENCE ACROSS SERVICE MODES, IDENTIFICATION OF ANY
CAPACITY CONSTRAINTS OR SERVICE LIMITATIONS, AND AN ASSESSMENT OF
INNOVATIVE, TECHNOLOGY-ENABLED SERVICE MODELS; AND
(VII) AN ASSESSMENT OF BARRIERS FOR PARATRANSIT RIDERS AND
RIDERS WITH DISABILITIES TO ACCESS A LOW-INCOME FARE DISCOUNT.
(b) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE DISTRICT SHALL
COMPLETE, ADOPT, AND BEGIN IMPLEMENTING AN ACCESSIBLE
TRANSPORTATION SERVICE PLAN INFORMED BY THE COMPREHENSIVE
PARATRANSIT SERVICE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2.5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION. THE PLAN MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A HOLISTIC VISION FOR PROVIDING APPROPRIATE AND ACCESSIBLE
TRANSPORTATION SERVICE TO RIDERS WITH DISABILITIES IN THE DISTRICT;
(II) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF AN OVERARCHING FRAMEWORK TO
GUIDE FUTURE PARATRANSIT DECISION-MAKING, INCLUDING MEASURABLE
METRICS OF PERFORMANCE IN ACCESS, RELIABILITY, EQUITY, AND
COST-EFFECTIVENESS;
(III) A FRAMEWORK FOR FISCAL SUSTAINABILITY INFORMED BY
CONSIDERATIONS OF LONG-TERM COST PROJECTIONS, TRADEOFFS BETWEEN
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-150

SERVICES, AND PEER AGENCY COMPARISONS;
(IV) A FRAMEWORK FOR THE USE OF ANY INNOVATIVE AND
TECHNOLOGY-ENABLED SERVICE MODELS; AND
(V) AN IMPLEMENTATION FRAMEWORK WITH TIMELINES, PRIORITY
ACTIONS, AND REPORTING ON IMPLEMENTATION PROGRESS.
(3) Reports.
(c) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2028, THE DISTRICT SHALL PRESENT
THE PARATRANSIT SERVICE STUDY AND ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION
SERVICE PLAN TO A JOINT MEETING OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMITTEE AND THE
SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES.
(d) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE DISTRICT SHALL SUBMIT
TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND
ENERGY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, AND TO THE
GOVERNOR, A REPORT CONTAINING RESPONSES TO AND THE DISTRICT'S
IMPLEMENTATION TIMELINE OF ALL RECOMMENDATIONS MADE TO THE
DISTRICT BY THE 2025-2026 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT
ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE, CREATED IN SECTION 24-38.5-124, AS IT
EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL ON JULY 1, 2026.
(e) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
JANUARY 31 THEREAFTER, THE DISTRICT SHALL REPORT ON THE FOLLOWING
TO A JOINT MEETING OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES TRANSPORTATION,
HOUSING, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE
TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES:
(I) THE DISTRICT'S BUDGET, INCLUDING EXTERNAL FUNDING, AND
FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE;
(II) RIDERSHIP;
(III) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF SENATE BILL 25-161, ENACTED IN
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-150

2025, INCLUDING THE DISTRICT'S PROGRESS IN:
(A) DELIVERING THE PROJECTS IDENTIFIED IN THE TEN-YEAR
STRATEGIC PLAN DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND THE
COMPREHENSIVE OPERATIONAL ANALYSIS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(B) ALIGNING WITH STATE CLIMATE GOALS AS REQUIRED BY SECTION
32-9-119.7 (9); AND
(IV) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SENATE BILL 26-150, ENACTED
IN 2026, INCLUDING THE DISTRICT'S PROGRESS ON IMPLEMENTING ITS
ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION SERVICE PLAN DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(2.5) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-111, amend (1)(a)
and (4); and add (1)(c), (1)(d), and (7) as follows:
32-9-111. Election of directors - dates - terms.
(1) (a) After the federal census in 1980 and each federal census
thereafter BEFORE THE 2030 FEDERAL CENSUS, the board of directors shall
apportion the composition of the board into compact and contiguous
director districts so that the fifteen directors will represent, to the extent
practical, the people of the district on the basis of population. Such
apportionment shall MUST be completed before March 15 of the second year
following that in which the federal census is taken and shall MUST be made
only upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the total membership of the
board. If such apportionment is not completed before March 15 of such
year, the legislative council, with the assistance of the director of research
of the legislative council and the director of the office of legislative legal
services, shall, by April 15, apportion the composition of the board into
compact and contiguous director districts so that the fifteen directors will
represent, to the extent practicable, the people of the district on the basis of
population. The apportionment recommended by the legislative council
shall MUST be submitted to the general assembly which shall approve or
amend the apportionment before May 1 of such year.
(c) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 15, 2027, THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE
LEGAL SERVICES AND THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL APPORTION
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-150

THE COMPOSITION OF THE BOARD INTO COMPACT AND CONTIGUOUS
DIRECTOR DISTRICTS SO THAT THE FIVE ELECTED DIRECTORS WILL
REPRESENT, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICAL, THE PEOPLE OF THE DISTRICT ON
THE BASIS OF POPULATION. THE FIVE ELECTED DIRECTORS WHO WILL BE
ELECTED AT THE GENERAL ELECTION IN NOVEMBER 2028 WILL BE ELECTED
FROM THESE FIVE DIRECTOR DISTRICTS.
(d) AFTER THE FEDERAL CENSUS IN 2030 AND AFTER EACH FEDERAL
CENSUS THEREAFTER, THE INDEPENDENT LEGISLATIVE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 46 OF ARTICLE V OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION SHALL APPORTION THE COMPOSITION OF THE BOARD
INTO COMPACT AND CONTIGUOUS DIRECTOR DISTRICTS SO THAT THE FIVE
ELECTED DIRECTORS WILL REPRESENT, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICAL, THE
PEOPLE OF THE DISTRICT ON THE BASIS OF POPULATION. THE
APPORTIONMENT OF DIRECTOR DISTRICTS MUST BE COMPLETED ON THE SAME
TIMELINE AND USING THE SAME PROCEDURES AS THOSE SPECIFIED FOR THE
APPORTIONMENT OF SENATORIAL AND REPRESENTATIVE DISTRICTS IN
SECTIONS 46 TO 48.3 OF ARTICLE V OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(4) (a) Except as provided in this subsection (4), the regular term of
office of directors shall be four years.
(b) At the election held in 1982, eight members of the board shall
be elected for two-year terms. The two-year terms shall be determined by
lot at the first meeting of the board following the apportionment of director
districts. Seven members shall be elected for four-year terms.
(c) AT THE GENERAL ELECTION HELD IN NOVEMBER 2028, TWO OF
THE FIVE MEMBERS ELECTED WILL BE ELECTED TO TWO-YEAR TERMS. THE
TWO-YEAR TERMS WILL BE DETERMINED BY LOT DURING THE
APPORTIONMENT PROCESS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS
SECTION.
(7) MEMBERS ELECTED FROM DISTRICTS DRAWN IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (1)(c) OR (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION MAY SERVE UP TO TWO
TERMS, WITH EACH TERM EXPIRING AFTER A MEMBER HAS SERVED FOR FOUR
CONSECUTIVE CALENDAR YEARS. ANY TERM SERVED BY A MEMBER THAT
LASTS FOR LESS THAN TWO YEARS DOES NOT COUNT TOWARD THE MEMBER'S
TWO-TERM LIMIT, BUT A MEMBER SHALL NOT SERVE MORE THAN EIGHT
TOTAL YEARS ON THE BOARD. A TERM THAT A MEMBER SERVED ON THE
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-150

BOARD PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2029, COUNTS TOWARD THAT MEMBER'S
TWO-TERM LIMIT.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 32-9-111.5 as
follows:
32-9-111.5. Appointment of directors - dates - terms - vacancies
- removal.
(1) (a) ON OR BEFORE THE DAY OF THE NOVEMBER GENERAL
ELECTION, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT BOARD
MEMBERS WHO MUST SUBSEQUENTLY BE CONFIRMED BY THE SENATE. THE
APPOINTED MEMBERS' TERMS COMMENCE ON JANUARY 1 FOLLOWING THEIR
APPOINTMENT IN THE EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR. THE GOVERNOR SHALL
APPOINT THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
(I) ONE MEMBER FROM A LIST OF NOMINEES PROVIDED BY THE
DENVER REGIONAL COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A CURRENT OR FORMER MEMBER OF THE
UNION THAT REPRESENTS THE LARGEST COLLECTIVE BARGAINING UNIT OF
EMPLOYEES OF THE DISTRICT; AND
(III) TWO MEMBERS AT THE GOVERNOR'S DISCRETION AND IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(b) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, THE FOUR APPOINTED MEMBERS
SHALL EACH RESIDE WITHIN THE DISTRICT AND REPRESENT THE DISTRICT AT
LARGE.
(c) IN 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT FOUR NEW BOARD
MEMBERS WHOSE TERMS COMMENCE ON JANUARY 1, 2029. IN EACH
EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT TWO
MEMBERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION TO REPLACE THE TWO
MEMBERS WHOSE TERMS ARE SET TO EXPIRE THE FOLLOWING JANUARY 1.
(2) (a) WHEN APPOINTING MEMBERS, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ENSURE
THAT THE APPOINTED MEMBERS REPRESENT DIVERSE GEOGRAPHIC AREAS OF
THE DISTRICT, INCLUDING SUBURBAN COUNTIES, AND THAT THE FOUR
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-150

MEMBERS COLLECTIVELY POSSESS EXPERTISE RELATED TO THE FOLLOWING
AREAS:
(I) PUBLIC FINANCE, SUCH AS OPERATING AND CAPITAL BUDGETING,
FARE REVENUE AND SUBSIDY STRUCTURES, CAPITAL PROGRAM DELIVERY,
ASSET MANAGEMENT AND LIFECYCLE CAPITAL PLANNING, OR FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT OF A PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM;
(II) LAND USE AND MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, SUCH
AS TRANSIT-ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT, REGIONAL PLANNING, OR URBAN AND
RURAL MOBILITY;
(III) TRANSIT OPERATIONS, SUCH AS PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
MANAGEMENT, FLEET OPERATIONS, SCHEDULING, OR SYSTEM PERFORMANCE;
AND
(IV) TRANSIT AGENCY PROGRAMS SERVING DISPROPORTIONATELY
IMPACTED COMMUNITIES, AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-4-109
(2)(b)(II).
(b) THE GOVERNOR SHALL CONSIDER AND GIVE PREFERENCE TO
INDIVIDUALS THAT HAVE EXPERIENCE AND A BACKGROUND IN MULTIPLE
AREAS LISTED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2), BUT A MEMBER APPOINTED TO THE
BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IS NOT REQUIRED TO POSSESS
EXPERTISE IN MORE THAN ONE AREA LISTED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(3) (a) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3),
THE REGULAR TERM OF OFFICE OF MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR
AND CONFIRMED BY THE SENATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IS
FOUR YEARS. MEMBERS MAY SERVE UP TO TWO TERMS, WITH EACH TERM
EXPIRING AFTER A MEMBER HAS SERVED FOR FOUR CONSECUTIVE CALENDAR
YEARS. ANY TERM SERVED BY A MEMBER THAT LASTS FOR LESS THAN TWO
YEARS DOES NOT COUNT TOWARD THE MEMBER'S TWO-TERM LIMIT.
(b) OF THE INITIALLY APPOINTED MEMBERS WHOSE TERMS BEGIN ON
JANUARY 1, 2029, THE TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED AT THE GOVERNOR'S
DISCRETION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION
SERVE INITIAL TERMS OF TWO YEARS.
(4) (a) (I) BEGINNING IN 2028, NO FEWER THAN THIRTY DAYS BEFORE
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-150

THE DAY OF THE NOVEMBER GENERAL ELECTION IN AN EVEN-NUMBERED
YEAR, THE DENVER REGIONAL COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS SHALL PROVIDE
THE GOVERNOR WITH A LIST OF NOMINEES FOR BOARD APPOINTMENTS, FROM
WHICH THE GOVERNOR SHALL SELECT A MEMBER TO APPOINT TO THE BOARD
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION. THE LIST MUST
CONTAIN AT LEAST THREE QUALIFIED NOMINEES. IF THE DENVER REGIONAL
COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS FAILS TO PROVIDE A LIST WITHIN THE REQUIRED
TIME FRAME, THE GOVERNOR MAY APPOINT A MEMBER TO THE BOARD AT THE
GOVERNOR'S DISCRETION AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(II) WHEN SELECTING INDIVIDUALS FOR THE LIST OF NOMINEES, THE
DENVER REGIONAL COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS SHALL:
(A) CONSIDER AND GIVE PREFERENCE TO INDIVIDUALS THAT HAVE
EXPERIENCE AND A BACKGROUND IN MULTIPLE AREAS LISTED IN SUBSECTION
(2)(a) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(B) MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT THE NOMINEES
REFLECT THE GEOGRAPHIC AND DEMOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE DISTRICT'S
RIDERSHIP AND SERVICE AREA AND THAT THE NOMINEE LIST INCLUDES
INDIVIDUALS FROM DIVERSE RACIAL, CULTURAL, DISABILITY, AND GENDER
BACKGROUNDS AND INDIVIDUALS REPRESENTING BOTH URBAN AND
SUBURBAN COMMUNITIES WITHIN THE DISTRICT.
(b) BEGINNING IN 2028, NO FEWER THAN THIRTY DAYS BEFORE THE
DAY OF THE NOVEMBER GENERAL ELECTION IN AN EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR,
THE UNION THAT REPRESENTS THE LARGEST COLLECTIVE BARGAINING UNIT
OF EMPLOYEES OF THE DISTRICT SHALL PROVIDE THE GOVERNOR WITH A LIST
OF AT LEAST THREE QUALIFIED NOMINEES FOR THE MEMBER APPOINTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) (a) IF THE SEAT OF A MEMBER THAT WAS APPOINTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION IS VACANT, THE
DENVER REGIONAL COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS SHALL, WITHIN SIXTY DAYS
AFTER THE VACANCY OCCURS AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4) OF
THIS SECTION, PROVIDE THE GOVERNOR WITH A LIST OF AT LEAST THREE
QUALIFIED NOMINEES FOR THE VACANT MEMBER SEAT. THE GOVERNOR
SHALL, WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE LIST OR SIXTY DAYS AFTER
THE VACANCY OCCURS, WHICHEVER IS LATER, APPOINT A MEMBER FROM THE
LIST TO FILL THE VACANCY. IF THE DENVER REGIONAL COUNCIL OF
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-150

GOVERNMENTS FAILS TO PROVIDE A LIST WITHIN THE REQUIRED TIME FRAME,
THE GOVERNOR MAY APPOINT A MEMBER TO FILL THE VACANCY AT THE
GOVERNOR'S DISCRETION AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(b) IF THE SEAT OF A MEMBER THAT WAS APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION IS VACANT, THE UNION THAT
REPRESENTS THE LARGEST COLLECTIVE BARGAINING UNIT OF EMPLOYEES OF
THE DISTRICT SHALL, WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE VACANCY OCCURS,
PROVIDE THE GOVERNOR WITH A LIST OF AT LEAST THREE QUALIFIED
NOMINEES FOR THE VACANT MEMBER SEAT. THE GOVERNOR MAY APPOINT
A MEMBER TO FILL THE VACANCY IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(c) IF THE SEAT OF A MEMBER THAT WAS APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION IS VACANT, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL, WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE VACANCY OCCURS, APPOINT A
MEMBER TO FILL THE VACANCY AT THE GOVERNOR'S DISCRETION AND IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(d) THE TERM OF A MEMBER THAT FILLS A VACANCY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SUBSECTION (5) EXPIRES WHEN THE TERM OF THE FORMER
VACATING MEMBER WOULD HAVE EXPIRED.
(6) THE GOVERNOR MAY REMOVE A MEMBER APPOINTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION FOR MALFEASANCE IN OFFICE, NEGLECT OF
DUTY, FAILURE TO REGULARLY ATTEND MEETINGS, OR ANY OTHER CAUSE
THAT RENDERS THE MEMBER INCAPABLE OR UNFIT TO DISCHARGE THE
DUTIES OF THE BOARD. IF ANY MEMBER IS ABSENT FROM TWO CONSECUTIVE
MEETINGS WITHOUT REASONABLE CAUSE, AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD
CHAIRPERSON, THE CHAIRPERSON SHALL NOTIFY THE GOVERNOR, WHO MAY
REMOVE THE ABSENT MEMBER AND APPOINT A QUALIFIED REPLACEMENT FOR
THE UNEXPIRED TERM.
(7) A PROSPECTIVE MEMBER TO BE APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION SHALL DISCLOSE ANY POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST TO
THE GOVERNOR AND THE RELEVANT SENATE COMMITTEE OF REFERENCE OF
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY PRIOR TO CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE AND
SHALL DISCLOSE ANY CONFLICTS THAT ARISE DURING THE MEMBER'S TERM
AT A PUBLIC BOARD MEETING. FAILURE TO DISCLOSE A KNOWN CONFLICT OF
INTEREST, OR TAKING ACTION ON A MATTER IN WHICH THE MEMBER HAS AN
UNDISCLOSED CONFLICT OF INTEREST, CONSTITUTES CAUSE FOR REMOVAL
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-150

BY THE GOVERNOR PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-112, amend (1),
(1.5), and (2) as follows:
32-9-112. Vacancies of elected members - appointments - recall.
(1) A change of residence of a member of ELECTED TO the board to
a place outside the director district from which the member was elected
shall automatically create CREATES a vacancy on the board. Upon a vacancy
OF AN ELECTED MEMBER occurring for any reason other than normal
expiration of a term, the vacancy shall MUST be filled by appointment by the
board of county commissioners of the county wherein the director district
is located or, in the case of a member elected in Denver, by the mayor of the
city and county of Denver, with the approval of the city council of said city
and county. In the case of a director district which contains territory in two
or more counties, or in the city and county of Denver and in one or more
counties, the vacancy shall MUST be filled by appointment by the board of
county commissioners of the county wherein the largest number of eligible
electors of the director district reside; except that, if the largest number of
eligible electors of the director district reside in the city and county of
Denver, the vacancy shall MUST be filled by appointment by the mayor of
the city and county of Denver, with the approval of the city council of the
city and county.
(1.5) Any director appointed shall serve PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION
SERVES until the next regular election, at which time the vacancy shall MUST
be filled by election for any remaining unexpired portion of the term.
(2) Effective July 1, 1983, any ELECTED member of the board may
be recalled from office by the eligible electors of the director district such
member represents pursuant to the provisions of part 1 of article 12 of title
1. C.R.S.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-114, amend
(1)(c); and add (1)(c.5) and (2) as follows:
32-9-114. Board's administrative powers - terms of elected
chairperson.
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-150

(1) The board has the following administrative powers:
(c) To elect one director as chairman CHAIRPERSON of the board; and
another director as chairman pro tem of the board, and to appoint one or
more persons as secretary and treasurer of the board
(c.5) TO ELECT ONE DIRECTOR AS CHAIRPERSON PRO TEMPORE OF
THE BOARD AND TO ELECT ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS AS SECRETARY AND
TREASURER OF THE BOARD;
(2) A DIRECTOR ELECTED AS CHAIRPERSON PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION MAY SERVE AS CHAIRPERSON FOR
MULTIPLE TERMS.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-116, amend (3);
and add (4) as follows:
32-9-116. Meetings of board.
(3) Effective ON AND AFTER January 1, 1983, BUT BEFORE JANUARY
1, 2029, any action of the board shall require REQUIRES the affirmative vote
of at least eight members present and voting.
(4) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, ANY ACTION OF THE BOARD
REQUIRES THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF AT LEAST FIVE MEMBERS PRESENT AND
VOTING.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-117, amend (1)
and (2); and add (5) and (6) as follows:
32-9-117. Compensation of directors.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
Effective January 1, 1983, THROUGH DECEMBER 31, 2008, each director
shall receive a sum of three thousand dollars per annum.
(2) Effective January 1, 2009, each director elected at the 2008
general election or at any general election thereafter OCCURRING AFTER
2008 BUT BEFORE 2028 and each director appointed to fill a vacancy for an
unexpired term of a director elected at the 2008 general election or AT any
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-150

GENERAL election thereafter OCCURRING AFTER 2008 BUT BEFORE 2028 shall
receive a sum of twelve thousand dollars per annum, payable at the rate of
one thousand dollars per month.
(5) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION, EACH
DIRECTOR WHOSE TERM BEGINS ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, RECEIVES
A SUM OF THIRTY-SIX THOUSAND DOLLARS PER ANNUM, PAYABLE AT THE
RATE OF THREE THOUSAND DOLLARS PER MONTH.
(6) A DIRECTOR SELECTED TO SERVE AS CHAIRPERSON IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 32-9-114 (1)(c) AT ANY TIME ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2029, RECEIVES AN ANNUAL SUM, PAYABLE IN MONTHLY
INSTALLMENTS, EQUAL TO ONE HUNDRED FIFTY PERCENT OF THE SALARY OF
A DIRECTOR AS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-109.5, amend
(1), (2), (4) introductory portion, (4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), and (4)(d) as follows:
32-9-109.5. Board of directors - membership - powers - reports.
(1) (a) Effective BEGINNING January 1, 1983, AND ENDING
DECEMBER 31, 2028, the governing body of the district shall be IS a board
of directors consisting of fifteen persons, each of whom is an eligible
elector residing within the A director district.
(b) EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2029, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE
DISTRICT IS A BOARD OF DIRECTORS CONSISTING OF NINE INDIVIDUALS AS
FOLLOWS:
(I) FIVE ELIGIBLE ELECTORS RESIDING WITHIN A DIRECTOR DISTRICT,
ELECTED AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 32-9-111; AND
(II) FOUR ELIGIBLE ELECTORS RESIDING WITHIN THE DISTRICT AND
REPRESENTING THE DISTRICT AT LARGE, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR AND
CONFIRMED BY THE SENATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 32-9-111.5.
(2) (a) THE ELECTED members of the board of directors shall MUST
be elected as provided in section 32-9-111.
(b) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SERVING ON DECEMBER
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-150

31, 2028, SHALL EXPIRE ON JANUARY 1, 2029, AND A NEW BOARD,
CONSTITUTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL
TAKE OFFICE ON JANUARY 1, 2029.
(4) All powers, duties, functions, rights, and privileges vested in the
district shall be ARE exercised and performed by the board; except that the
exercise of any executive, administrative, or ministerial powers may be
delegated by the board to officers and employees of the district. These
powers, duties, functions, rights, and privileges include, in addition to any
other powers and duties specified in this article 9:
(a) Setting policy objectives, INCLUDING POLICY OBJECTIVES THAT
ARE DIRECTLY DESIGNED TO GROW RIDERSHIP WITHIN THE DISTRICT, to be
implemented by employees of the district;
(b) Hiring, and managing, AND EVALUATING the district's general
manager and chief executive officer BASED ON APPROPRIATE MEASURES OF
PERFORMANCE ALIGNED WITH THE DISTRICT'S TEN-YEAR STRATEGIC PLAN
SET FORTH IN SECTION 32-9-165 (1);
(c) HIRING, EVALUATING, AND overseeing the district's general
counsel, AND ENSURING THAT THE DISTRICT'S GENERAL COUNSEL REPORTS
DIRECTLY TO THE BOARD;
(d) Developing, adopting, and overseeing the district's A FISCALLY
RESPONSIBLE budget FOR THE DISTRICT, including an annual capital budget
with project costs and financing mechanisms;
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 32-9-118 as
follows:
32-9-118. Conflicts in interest prohibited.
(1) No A director, officer, employee, or agent of the district shall be
interested NOT HAVE AN INTEREST in any contract or transaction with the
district except in his AN official representative capacity.
(2) A DIRECTOR WHO HAS A PERSONAL OR PRIVATE INTEREST IN ANY
MATTER PROPOSED OR PENDING BEFORE THE BOARD SHALL DISCLOSE SUCH
INTEREST TO THE BOARD, SHALL NOT VOTE THEREON, AND SHALL REFRAIN
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-150

FROM ATTEMPTING TO INFLUENCE THE DECISIONS OF THE OTHER DIRECTORS
IN VOTING ON THE MATTER.
(3) A DIRECTOR WHO IS A CURRENT MEMBER OF THE UNION THAT
REPRESENTS THE LARGEST COLLECTIVE BARGAINING UNIT OF EMPLOYEES OF
THE DISTRICT SHALL RECUSE THEMSELF FROM ANY BOARD ACTION OR VOTE
DIRECTLY CONCERNING COLLECTIVE BARGAINING, A LABOR AGREEMENT, OR
THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT OF THE BARGAINING UNIT
REPRESENTED BY THE DIRECTOR.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 32-9-119.7, add (13)
as follows:
32-9-119.7. Cost efficiency of transit services - climate goals -
employee retention goals - subregional service council coordination -
reporting - plans - definition - repeal.
(13) (a) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, TO SUPPORT THE
SUBREGIONAL SERVICE COUNCILS CREATED BY THE DISTRICT, THE DISTRICT
SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE DEDICATED STAFF TO CO-CHAIR AND SUPPORT EACH
SUBREGIONAL SERVICE COUNCIL; AND
(II) WORK WITH SUBREGIONAL SERVICE COUNCIL MEMBERS TO
IDENTIFY A LOCAL LEADER TO CO-CHAIR EACH SUBREGIONAL SERVICE
COUNCIL.
(b) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2028, THE SUBREGIONAL SERVICE
COUNCILS SHALL MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE BOARD ON:
(I) ALIGNING DISTRICT TRANSIT SERVICES WITH LOCAL AND
REGIONAL PLANS;
(II) IMPLEMENTING JOINT PROJECTS TO ADDRESS SERVICE GAPS;
(III) LEVERAGING EXISTING INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENTS
AND PROJECTS FOR EXPANDED SERVICE DELIVERY;
(IV) IDENTIFYING STRATEGIES TO EXPAND FUNDING; AND
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-150

(V) CONSIDERATIONS OF EQUITY, RIDERSHIP, DEMAND, AND
LONG-TERM REGIONAL GROWTH.
(c) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST TWICE PER YEAR TO RECEIVE
RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE SUBREGIONAL SERVICE COUNCILS AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (13)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(d) ANNUALLY BEGINNING IN 2028, THE DISTRICT SHALL REPORT TO
THE TRANSPORTATION LEGISLATION REVIEW COMMITTEE CREATED IN
SECTION 43-2-145 (1)(a) AND TO A JOINT MEETING OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT
COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE,
OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, ON THE SUBREGIONAL SERVICE COUNCIL
RECOMMENDATIONS AND THE DISTRICT'S RESPONSES THERETO.
SECTION 14. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-150

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-150